Utah statutes.
72-7-103.   Limitation on access authority.

A highway authority may not deny reasonable ingress and egress to property adjoining a public highway except where:

(1)  the highway authority acquires right of ingress and egress by gift, agreement, purchase, eminent domain, or otherwise; or

(2)  no right of ingress or egress exists between the right-of-way and the adjoining property.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

